Illinois, session 104th, SB41.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Clean 5Transportation Standard Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) The transportation sector in this State is a 8    leading source of criteria air pollutants and greenhouse 9    gas emissions, which collectively endanger public health 10    and welfare by causing and contributing to increased air 11    pollution and climate change. 12        (2) Shifting from petroleum-based transportation fuels 13    to alternative fuels has the potential to significantly 14    reduce transportation emissions of air pollutants and 15    greenhouse gases and is recommended by the 16    Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change as an important 17    pathway for holding global warming at 1.5 degrees Celsius. 18    A clean transportation standard would promote innovation 19    in, and production and use of, nonpetroleum fuels that 20    reduce vehicle-related and fuel-related air pollution that 21    endangers public health and welfare and disproportionately 22    impacts disadvantaged communities. 23        (3) Credits generated through the use of clean fuel   SB0041- 2 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1    under this Act will promote innovation and investment in 2    clean fuels.  3    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:4    "Agency" means the Environmental Protection Agency.5    "Aggregator" or "credit aggregator" means a person who 6registers to participate in the clean transportation standard 7program on behalf of one or more credit generators to 8facilitate credit generation and to trade credits.9    "Aviation fuel" means a fuel suitably blended to be used 10in aviation engines. 11    "Backstop aggregator" means a qualified nonprofit entity 12approved by the Agency to aggregate credits for electricity 13used as a transportation fuel when those credits would not 14otherwise be generated.15    "Board" means the Pollution Control Board.16    "Carbon intensity" means the amount of lifecycle 17greenhouse gas emissions per unit of fuel energy expressed in 18grams of carbon dioxide equivalent per megajoule. 19    "Clean fuel" means a transportation fuel that is 20domestically produced and has a carbon intensity below the 21clean transportation standard carbon intensity standard in a 22given year. 23    "Clean transportation standard" means the standard adopted 24by the Board under Section 15 for the reduction, on average, of 25lifecycle carbon intensity of fuels used for on-road   SB0041- 3 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1transportation. If there is an industry-accepted standard for 2calculating the carbon intensity of different modes of 3transportation, such as off-road, light rail, and other forms 4of mass transportation, the Board shall adopt that standard 5for those modes of transportation. 6    "Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers" or "CPI-U" 7means the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 8the United States Department of Labor that measures the 9average change in prices of goods and services, United States 10city average, all items.11    "Credit" means a unit of measure generated when clean fuel 12is provided for use in this State, such that one credit is 13equal to one metric ton of carbon dioxide equivalent. 14    "Credit generator" means a regulated entity that generates 15a credit in the clean transportation standard.16    "Deficit" means a unit of measure generated when a fuel 17provided in this State has a carbon intensity that exceeds the 18clean transportation standard for the applicable year, 19expressed in metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent. 20    "Deficit generator" means a regulated entity that 21generates a deficit in the clean transportation standard.22    "Fuel" means any one or more of the following that is used 23to power vehicles or equipment for the purpose of 24transportation: electricity or a liquid, gaseous, or blended 25fuel, including gasoline, diesel, liquefied petroleum gas, 26natural gas, or hydrogen.   SB0041- 4 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1    "Fuel pathway" means a detailed description of all stages 2of a transportation fuel's production and use, including 3feedstock growth, extraction, processing, transportation, 4distribution, and combustion or use by an end user. 5    "Lifecycle carbon intensity" means the quantity of 6greenhouse gas emissions per unit of energy, expressed in 7carbon dioxide equivalent per megajoule, emitted by the fuel, 8including both direct and indirect sources, as calculated by 9the Agency under subsection (2) of Section 20 using the 10methods described under Section 30. 11    "Military tactical vehicle" means a motor vehicle owned by 12the U.S. Department of Defense or the U.S. military services 13and used in combat, combat support, combat service support, 14tactical or relief operations, or training for such 15operations. 16    "Petroleum-only portion" means the component of gasoline 17or diesel fuel before blending with ethanol, biodiesel, 18biofuel, or other clean fuel. 19    "Provider" means: 20        (1) with respect to any liquid fuel, hydrogen fuel, 21    and renewable propane used as a fuel source for 22    transportation, the person who refines, produces, or 23    imports the fuel;24        (2) with respect to any biomethane, the person who 25    imports or produces, refines, treats, or otherwise 26    processes biogas into biomethane used as a fuel source for   SB0041- 5 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1    transportation; 2        (3) with respect to electricity used as a fuel source 3    for transportation, the person who is the direct provider 4    of electricity, the electric vehicle charging service 5    provider, the electric utility, the electric vehicle fleet 6    operator, the electric vehicle manufacturer, and the 7    owners or operators of charging stations located on 8    commercial property; or9        (4) with respect to other types of fuel, a person 10    determined to be the provider by the Agency.11    "Provider" does not include the owner or operator of a 12residential charging station.13    "Regulated entity" means any entity, whether a credit 14generator or deficit generator, that has registered, on a 15mandatory or permissive basis, to participate in the clean 16transportation standard.17    "Sustainable aviation fuel" means an aviation fuel with a 18carbon intensity sufficient to generate credits under the 19clean transportation standard upon its production or supply. 20    "Tactical support equipment" means equipment using a 21portable engine, including turbines, that meets military 22specifications, is owned by the U.S. Department of Defense or 23the U.S. military services or its allies, and is used in 24combat, combat support, combat service support, tactical or 25relief operations, or training for such operations. "Tactical 26support equipment" includes, but is not limited to, engines   SB0041- 6 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1associated with portable generators, aircraft start carts, 2heaters and lighting carts.  3    Section 15. Rulemaking and baseline calculations for clean 4transportation standard. 5    (a) To the extent allowed by federal law, within 24 months 6after the effective date of this Act, the Agency shall propose 7and the Board shall adopt rules establishing a clean 8transportation standard in order to reduce, within 10 years of 9the adoption of the Agency's rules by the Board, the lifecycle 10carbon intensity of fuels for the ground transportation sector 11by 25% below the 2019 baseline level as calculated under this 12Section. After the 25% reduction described in this Section is 13attained, the Agency shall prepare a report that proposes 14further reductions in the lifecycle carbon intensity of fuels 15for the ground transportation sector for the following 10 16years. The report prepared by the Agency shall include 17proposed changes to this Act that are required to implement 18those reductions. The rules proposed and adopted shall be 19subject to public notice and comment under the Illinois 20Administrative Procedure Act. The Board may recommend to the 21General Assembly reductions to the clean transportation 22standard below those adopted in accordance with this Act, 23using factors, including, but not limited to, advances in 24clean fuel technology. The rules adopted by the Board under 25this Section shall include fees for the registration of   SB0041- 7 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1regulated entities to offset the costs incurred by the Board 2and the Agency that are associated with implementing the clean 3transportation standard. These fees shall be used only in 4connection with the administration of the program and may be 5levied differently based on whether a regulated entity is a 6credit generator or deficit generator. Except where otherwise 7provided in this Act, the Agency shall consider rules that are 8harmonized, to the extent practicable, with the regulatory 9standards, exemptions, reporting obligations, and other clean 10transportation standard compliance requirements and methods 11for credit generation of other states that have adopted 12low-carbon fuel standards or similar greenhouse gas emissions 13requirements applicable specifically to transportation fuels. 14    (b) The Agency shall calculate the baseline carbon 15intensities of the petroleum-only portion of all 16transportation fuels produced or imported in 2019 for use in 17this State by: 18        (1) reviewing and considering the best available 19    applicable scientific data and calculations; and20        (2) using a lifecycle emissions, performance-based 21    approach that is technology-and-feedstock neutral.  22    Section 20. Contents of clean transportation standard. The 23clean transportation standard adopted by the Board, by rule, 24shall:25        (1) apply to all providers in the State;   SB0041- 8 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1        (2) be measured based on a lifecycle carbon intensity 2    that shall be calculated by the Agency in accordance with 3    Section 30;4        (3) recognize voluntary farm emissions reductions that 5    contribute to the reduced carbon intensity of fuels by 6    allowing credit generators to use individualized 7    farm-level carbon intensity scoring for approved 8    sustainable agricultural practices and by requiring the 9    Agency to use the GREET model's Feedstock Carbon Intercity 10    Calculator (FD-CIC) to determine individualized farm-level 11    carbon intensity scoring; 12        (4) take into consideration the low-carbon clean 13    transportation fuel standards that are pending or have 14    been adopted in other states, including their provisions 15    related to the inclusion of additional credit 16    opportunities from activities and projects that support 17    the reduction or removal of greenhouse gas emissions 18    associated with transportation in the State, and that 19    allow regulated entities to generate credits under any 20    overlapping current and future federal transportation fuel 21    statutes and regulations;22        (5) include a credit price cap (i) that is to be 23    determined by the Agency and confirmed by the Board to 24    contain costs if the fuel supply forecasts determine that 25    not enough credits will be available and (ii) that shall 26    be adjusted annually by the rate of inflation as measured   SB0041- 9 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1    by the most recently available 12 months of the Consumer 2    Price Index for All Urban Consumers;3        (6) contain a structure for compliance that conforms 4    with the marketplace system described in Section 25, 5    including, but not limited to, details, such as:6            (A) methods for assigning compliance obligations 7        and methods for tracking tradable credits;8            (B) mechanisms that allow credits to be traded, 9        transferred, sold, and banked for future compliance 10        periods;11            (C) mechanisms that provide for the creation of a 12        list of accepted credit transactions and a list of 13        prohibited forms of credit transactions, which may 14        include trades involving, related to, or associated 15        with any of the following:16                (i) any manipulative or deceptive device;17                (ii) a corner or an attempt to corner the 18            market for credits;19                (iii) fraud or an attempt to defraud any other 20            entity;21                (iv) false, misleading, or inaccurate reports 22            concerning information or conditions that affect 23            or tend to affect the price of a credit; and 24                (v) applications, reports, statements, or 25            documents required to be filed under this Act that 26            are false or misleading with respect to a material   SB0041- 10 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1            fact or that omit a material fact necessary to 2            make the contents therein not misleading;3            (C) procedures for verifying the validity of 4        credits and deficits generated under the clean 5        transportation standard;6            (D) mechanisms by which persons associated with 7        the supply chains of transportation fuels that are 8        used for purposes that are exempt from the clean 9        transportation standard described in Section 40 and 10        persons that are associated with the supply chains of 11        transportation fuels and will generate credits may 12        register with the Agency to participate in the clean 13        transportation standard program; and14            (E) an administrative procedure by which a 15        regulated entity may contest the Board's or Agency's 16        calculation prior to the levying of a penalty for 17        failure to remedy a given deficit;18            (F) procedures that will allow the Agency to 19        cancel or reverse (i) a credit transfer that is 20        determined to be a prohibited transaction under items 21        (i) through (v) of subparagraph (B) or (ii) any other 22        prohibited transaction as determined by the Board in 23        rulemaking;24        (7) contain a program review procedure whereby the 25    Board or Agency shall, every 3 years after the 26    implementation of the clean transportation standard,   SB0041- 11 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1    solicit feedback from and consult with representatives 2    from stakeholder groups, including representatives from 3    the fuel production industry, the transportation industry, 4    the agricultural industry, environmental advocacy 5    organizations, labor organizations, representatives from 6    impacted environmental justice communities, as defined in 7    Section 801-10 of the Illinois Finance Authority Act, and 8    representatives from related State agencies; the substance 9    of the consultations shall include, but may not be limited 10    to, a review of the economic impact of the clean 11    transportation standard, whether the clean transportation 12    standard is adhering to the established carbon intensity 13    reduction goals, the health impact of the emissions 14    reductions on disadvantaged environmental justice 15    communities, as defined in Section 801-10 of the Illinois 16    Finance Authority Act, and whether access to 17    transportation has been affected as a result of the 18    implementation of the clean transportation standard;19        (8) include annual carbon intensity reduction 20    standards that are to be met by regulated entities and 21    that result in the attainment of carbon intensity 22    reduction targets set by the Board;23        (9) maximize benefits to the environment and natural 24    resources and develop safeguards and incentives to protect 25    natural lands and enhance environmental integrity, 26    including biodiversity;  SB0041- 12 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1        (10) aim to support, through credit generation or 2    other financial means, voluntary farmer-led efforts to 3    adopt agricultural practices that benefit soil health and 4    water quality;5        (11) support equitable transportation electrification 6    that benefits all communities and is powered primarily 7    with low-carbon and carbon-free electricity;8        (12) seek to improve air quality and public health, 9    targeting communities that bear a disproportionate health 10    burden from transportation pollution; 11        (13) establish, in consultation with the Department of 12    Agriculture and the Department of Transportation, a 13    procedure for determining fuel pathways that:14            (A) is consistent for all fuel types;15            (B) is based on science and engineering; and16            (C) accounts for any on-site additional energy use 17        by a carbon capture technology employed in the fuel 18        production process, including, but not limited to, 19        generation, distillation, and compression;20        (14) recognize that farmers who can demonstrate use of 21    production methods that lower the carbon intensity of 22    their commodities shall be compensated a fair market value 23    that is, at minimum, commensurate with costs associated 24    with those low-carbon production methods or shall be 25    provided a fair share of the increased market value of the 26    end-use product that their commodity is used to produce.   SB0041- 13 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1    Compensation may come in a variety of forms, including, 2    but not limited to, practice-based incentive payments, 3    outcome-based incentive payments, price premiums, or other 4    forms of payment. The Agency shall also protect farm data 5    by ensuring farmer ownership of data for a specific amount 6    of time or negotiated on an annual basis;7        (15) contain mechanisms to excuse noncompliance from 8    enforcement action if compliance is impossible, including 9    rules that shall specify the criteria and procedures for 10    the Agency to determine whether a period of noncompliance 11    is excusable in accordance with Sections 50 and 55;12        (16) include mechanisms by which providers who would 13    be eligible to generate credits from electricity used as 14    transportation fuel may assign their right to generate 15    credits to an aggregator, and include mechanisms by which 16    a backstop aggregator may register with the program to 17    generate credits if an electric utility opts out of the 18    program; and19        (17) provide indirect accounting mechanisms, such as 20    book-and-claim or mass-balancing for clean fuels entering 21    fungible supply systems that can access this State. 22    Section 25. Credit market; verification and data privacy; 23compliance and penalties. 24    (a) The clean transportation standard adopted by the Board 25shall take the form of a credit marketplace with the following   SB0041- 14 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1structure. The marketplace shall consist of a system of 2credits and deficits monitored by the Agency. The Agency shall 3compile a list of fuel pathways that providers may use to 4generate credits. Providers seeking to be credit generators 5must register with the Agency and attest to the transportation 6fuels they provide in the State in order to qualify to generate 7credits. Each deficit generator must register and comply with 8the program. Fuels that are registered with the program must 9have a dedicated, verifiable fuel pathway with a carbon 10intensity score measurable by software described in Section 30 11and assigned a unique identifier by the Agency. Providers 12reaching or exceeding the required reduction of lifecycle 13carbon intensity under the clean transportation standard shall 14receive credits from the Agency upon verification described in 15subsection (b) at the end of a reoccurring reporting period as 16determined by the Agency. Fuel providers that are deficit 17generators during a year shall eliminate the deficit by either 18providing transportation fuels whose carbon intensity is at or 19below the level of that year's annual clean transportation 20standard or by purchasing credits to offset the deficit. The 21system of credits created under this subsection shall provide 22credits based on a lifecycle emissions performance-based 23approach that is technology neutral, feedstock neutral, and 24has the purpose of achieving transportation fuel 25decarbonization. 26    (b) The Agency must, in collaboration with the Department   SB0041- 15 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1of Agriculture and the Department of Transportation, establish 2acceptable methods to verify that the transportation fuel used 3by regulated entities has been provided following the pathway 4bearing the unique identifier as attested by the regulated 5entity. The Agency is authorized to contract with third party 6verifiers to accomplish this requirement. Upon registering 7with the program, regulated entities must agree to provide 8data related to the registered fuel pathway used to generate 9credits or deficits with the Agency as required to administer 10the program. Upon registering with the program, regulated 11entities must agree to be subject to periodic audits as 12determined by the Agency.13    All information gathered by or provided to the Agency or 14contractors of the Agency, either by regulated entities, 15agents of regulated entities, or growers of feedstock used in 16a registered fuel pathway by regulated entities, through 17either voluntary disclosure or audit, must not be shared by 18the Agency with any party except in relation to the 19administration of the clean transportation standard absent 20written consent by the regulated entity and the entity from 21which the data was gathered. This data must not be used for any 22purpose outside of the administration and enforcement of the 23clean transportation standard except by written consent from 24the original data holder. Ownership of all data shared or 25collected by the Agency for the administration and enforcement 26of the clean transportation standard is retained with the   SB0041- 16 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1entity from which the data originates. Data protected under 2this subparagraph does not include a regulated entity's credit 3or deficit balance, which may be publicly disclosed by the 4Agency.5    (c) Deficit generators who fail to offset their deficits 6at the conclusion of any compliance period administered by the 7Agency shall be subject to a civil penalty established by the 8Agency subject to the following limitations:9        (1) the value of the penalty shall correspond to the 10    amount of deficits attributed to a given regulated entity 11    at the time the transaction has completed; and 12        (2) for every one deficit the regulated entity fails 13    to offset, the penalty for failure to offset that deficit 14    shall not exceed 10 times the value of the credit needed to 15    offset the deficit.16    (d) Regulated entities that submit false information in 17support of an application to register for the clean 18transportation standard, that share false information during 19an audit or in support of an attestation, or that otherwise 20share false or inaccurate information to the Agency or a 21contractor working under the direction of the Agency shall be 22subject to penalties to be determined by the Agency by rule. 23Penalties under this paragraph may include monetary penalties, 24forfeiture of credits, and reversals of prohibited 25transactions as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) 26of Section 20. The Agency may waive penalties under this   SB0041- 17 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1subparagraph. If the violator under this subsection is a 2credit generator, following 3 violations, the Agency may 3remove the violating credit generator from the clean 4transportation standard. In determining whether penalties 5should be applied and, if a penalty is to be applied, the 6amount of penalties to be levied for violations under this 7subparagraph, the Agency shall consider:8        (1) evidence of willfulness by the regulated entity to 9    submit false information; 10        (2) the scope of the false information;11        (3) evidence of past submissions of false information; 12    and 13        (4) efforts undertaken by the regulated entity to 14    remedy the false submission.15    (e) The penalties provided for in this Section may be 16recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people 17of the State of Illinois by the State's Attorney of the county 18in which the violation occurred or by the Attorney General. 19Any penalties collected under this Section in an action in 20which the Attorney General has prevailed shall be used to 21offset registration fees in support of the administration of 22the clean transportation standard program. Any amount of 23penalties collected in addition to the amount needed to 24administer the clean transportation standard program shall be 25deposited into the Environmental Protection Trust Fund, to be 26used in accordance with the provisions of the Environmental   SB0041- 18 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1Protection Trust Fund Act. 2    (f) The Attorney General or the State's Attorney of a 3county in which a violation occurs may institute a civil 4action for an injunction, prohibitory or mandatory, to 5restrain violations of this Act or to require such actions as 6may be necessary to address violations of this Act.7    (g) The penalties and injunctions provided in this Act are 8in addition to any penalties, injunctions, or other relief 9provided under any other law. Nothing in this Act bars an 10action by the State for any other penalty, injunction, or 11other relief provided by any other law. 12    Section 30. Lifecycle carbon intensity calculations; 13software. The lifecycle carbon intensity calculation conducted 14by the Agency under paragraph (2) of Section 20 shall use the 15Argonne National Laboratory's GREET model and shall include 16all stages of fuel and feedstock production and distribution, 17from feedstock generation or extraction through the 18distribution, delivery, and use of the finished fuel by the 19ultimate consumer. The Agency shall, as needed and 20periodically as established by rule, use as up-to-date a model 21as possible, taking into account staffing and hiring needs. 22Carbon intensity values calculated for clean fuel pathways 23under construction or in operation using the current version 24of the GREET model shall be allowed if the GREET model is 25revised during the compliance year. In calculating the   SB0041- 19 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1lifecycle carbon intensity, the mass values for all greenhouse 2gases that are not carbon dioxide must be adjusted to account 3for each of their relative global warming potentials. This 4adjustment shall be performed using the global warming 5potential deemed most accurate by the Agency for each 6greenhouse gas for the period during which reductions in 7greenhouse gas emissions are to be attained under the clean 8transportation standard. When measuring the carbon intensity 9of clean fuels, the Agency shall use the GREET model's 10Feedstock Carbon Intensity Calculator (FD-CIC) for the 11purposes of accounting for variations in farming practices 12across different fuel pathways. 13    Section 35. Investments by backstop aggregators and 14utilities. In implementing this Act, the Agency and Board 15shall establish rules directing participating utilities and 16backstop aggregators under the standard to invest all revenue 17earned from trading credits toward investments into 18distribution, grid modernization, infrastructure and other 19projects that support transportation decarbonization, with at 20least 50% of such revenues supporting environmental justice 21communities as defined in Section 801-10 of the Illinois 22Finance Authority Act. All labor paid for with money from 23required investments under this Section shall be subject to 24the prevailing wage. The Agency and Board shall determine 25projects and goals under this Act in consultation with   SB0041- 20 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1relevant stakeholders, including, but not limited to, credit 2generators, affected communities, and environmental justice 3advocacy organizations. 4    Section 40. Exemptions. The following fuels are exempt 5from the clean transportation standard established in Section 615:7        (1) aviation fuels;8        (2) transportation fuel used in locomotives;9        (3) transportation fuel used in ocean-going vessels; 10    and11        (4) fuel used in military tactical vehicles and 12    tactical support equipment owned by the U.S. Department of 13    Defense or the U.S. military services.14However, providers of these fuels, if deemed to be clean 15fuels, shall be eligible under the rules adopted pursuant to 16this Act to receive credits on an opt-in basis that may be 17applied to future obligations or sold to deficit generators. 18    Section 45. Agency reporting obligation. Within 12 months 19after the implementation of the clean transportation standard, 20the Agency shall submit a report to the General Assembly 21detailing the implementation of the clean transportation 22standard, the reductions in greenhouse gas emissions that have 23been achieved through the clean transportation standard, and 24targets for future reductions in greenhouse gas emissions.   SB0041- 21 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1These reports shall include feedback solicited from 2stakeholders under paragraph (7) of Section 20. 3    Section 50. Fuel supply forecasting. In consultation with 4the Department of Transportation and the Department of 5Agriculture, the Agency must develop a periodic fuel supply 6forecast to project the availability of fuels to the State 7necessary for compliance with clean transportation standard 8requirements. The fuel supply forecast for each upcoming 9compliance period must include, but is not limited to, the 10following:11        (1) an estimate of the potential volumes of gasoline, 12    gasoline substitutes, and gasoline alternatives, and 13    diesel, diesel substitutes, and diesel alternatives 14    available to the State. In developing this estimate, the 15    Agency must consider, but is not limited to, considering: 16            (A) the existing and future vehicle fleet in this 17        State; and 18            (B) any constraints that might be preventing 19        access to available and cost-effective clean fuels by 20        the State, such as geographic and logistical factors, 21        and alleviating factors to the constraints;22        (2) an estimate of the total banked credits and 23    carried over deficits held by regulated entities, credit 24    generators, and credit aggregators at the beginning of the 25    compliance period, and an estimate of the total credits   SB0041- 22 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1    attributable to fuels described in paragraph (1);2        (3) an estimate of the number of credits needed to 3    meet the applicable clean transportation standard 4    requirements during the forecasted compliance period; and 5        (4) a comparison in the estimates of paragraphs (1) 6    and (2) with the estimate in paragraph (3), for the 7    purpose of indicating the availability of fuels and banked 8    credits needed for compliance with the requirements of 9    this chapter.10    The Agency may appoint a forecast review team of relevant 11experts to participate in the fuel supply forecast or 12examination of data required by this Section. The Agency must 13finalize a fuel supply forecast for an upcoming compliance 14period by no later than 90 days prior to the start of the 15compliance period.  16    Section 55. Forecast deferral.17    (a) No later than 30 calendar days before the commencement 18of a compliance period, the Agency shall issue an order 19declaring a forecast deferral if the fuel supply forecast 20under Section 50 projects that the amount of credits that will 21be available during the forecast compliance period will be 22less than 100% of the credits projected to be necessary for 23regulated parties to comply with the scheduled applicable 24clean transportation standard adopted by the Agency for the 25forecast compliance period.   SB0041- 23 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1    (b) An order declaring a forecast deferral under this 2Section must set forth:3        (1) the duration of the forecast deferral;4        (2) the types of fuel to which the forecast deferral 5    applies; and6        (3) which of the following methods the Agency has 7    selected for deferring compliance with the scheduled 8    applicable clean transportation standard during the 9    forecast deferral:10            (A) temporarily adjusting the scheduled applicable 11        clean transportation program standard to a standard 12        identified in the order that better reflects the 13        forecast availability of credits during the forecast 14        compliance period and requiring regulated entities to 15        comply with the temporary standard;16            (B) requiring regulated entities to comply only 17        with the clean transportation standard applicable 18        during the compliance period prior to the forecast 19        compliance period; or20            (C) suspending deficit accrual for part or all of 21        the forecast deferral period.22    (c) In implementing a forecast deferral, the Agency may 23take an action for deferring compliance with the clean 24transportation standard other than, or in addition to, 25selecting a method under paragraph (3) of subsection (b) only 26if the Agency determines that none of the methods under   SB0041- 24 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1paragraph (3) of subsection (b) will provide a sufficient 2mechanism for containing the costs of compliance with the 3clean transportation standard during the forecast deferral.4    (d) If the Agency makes the determination specified in 5subsection (c), the Agency shall:6        (1) include in the order declaring a forecast deferral 7    the determination and the action to be taken; and 8        (2) provide written notification and justification of 9    the determination and the action to:10            (A) the Governor;11            (B) the President of the Senate;12            (C) the Speaker of the House of Representatives;13            (D) the Majority and Minority Leaders of the 14        Senate; and15            (E) the Majority and Minority Leaders of the House 16        of Representatives.17    (e) The duration of a forecast deferral may not be less 18than one calendar quarter or longer than one compliance 19period. Only the Agency may terminate, by order, a forecast 20deferral before the expiration date of the forecast deferral. 21Termination of a forecast deferral is effective on the first 22day of the next calendar quarter after the date that the order 23declaring the termination is adopted. 24    Section 60. Conflicts with other State programs. Nothing 25in this Act precludes the Agency or Board from adopting or   SB0041- 25 -LRB104 06940 BDA 16977 b1maintaining other programs as permitted or required by 2existing or future legislation to reduce greenhouse gas 3emissions from the transportation sector. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.